Utah statutes.
59-13-306.   Due date of special fuel tax.
The special fuel tax is due and payable at the offices of the commission on or
before the last day of the month following each reporting period.  If not paid
at the offices of the commission or if the envelope enclosing the report or
remittance does not bear a post office cancellation mark dated on or before
the due date, the special fuel tax is delinquent.
